New York, session 2025-2026, S6452.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Legislative intent and findings. The legislature finds and 2 declares that the use of rental concessions in rent stabilized apart- 3 ments to charge one rent to tenants while reporting another rent to the 4 division of housing and community renewal undermines the purposes of the 5 rent stabilization laws. It is the intent of the legislature to clarify 6 that, for the purposes of the emergency tenant protection act of nine- 7 teen seventy-four or any successor legislation, the amount of rent 8 charged to and paid by the tenant or any initial adjusted monthly rent 9 charged and paid refers to the net effective rent, which sum shall 10 reflect the value of any rental concession. In order to effectuate the 11 meaning and intent of the rent stabilization laws, rents reported to the 12 division should equal the net effective rent paid by a tenant based upon 13 the value of any and all concessions, and in this respect the applica- 14 tion of the law will be facilitated by including rental concessions and 15 their value in annual rent registration statements. 16 § 2. Subdivision f of section 12-a of section 4 of chapter 576 of the 17 laws of 1974, constituting the emergency tenant protection act of 1974, 18 as added by chapter 403 of the laws of 1983, is amended to read as 19 follows: 20 f. An annual statement shall be filed containing the current rent for 21 each unit and such other information contained in subdivision a of this 22 section as shall be required by the division. The owner shall provide 23 each tenant then in occupancy with a copy of that portion of such annual EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00910-01-5 S. 6452 2 1 statement as pertains to the tenant's unit. Such annual statement shall 2 also contain information relating to any and all concessions granted for 3 a unit and, in any case where a concession includes a discount on rent 4 paid for a unit by the tenant, the current rent for each unit reported 5 by the owner to the division shall equal the net effective rent for such 6 unit based upon the value of such concession. 7 (1) For the purposes of this subdivision, the term "concession" shall 8 mean any temporary adjustment to a lease intended to induce a tenant to 9 sign or renew such lease, including without limitation a rebate, 10 discount, waiver, license agreement, proration, money payment, or phys- 11 ical good or service or access thereto. 12 (2) For the purposes of this subdivision, the term "net effective 13 rent" shall mean the average monthly rent charged to and paid by a 14 tenant over the duration of a tenant's occupancy of a unit pursuant to 15 an unexpired lease and any related rider or agreement. 16 § 3. Subdivision f of section 26-517 of the administrative code of 17 the city of New York is amended to read as follows: 18 f. An annual statement shall be filed containing the current rent for 19 each unit and such other information contained in subdivision a of this 20 section as shall be required by the division. The owner shall provide 21 each tenant then in occupancy with a copy of that portion of such annual 22 statement as pertains to the tenant's unit. Such annual statement shall 23 also contain information relating to any and all concessions granted for 24 a unit and, in any case where a concession includes a discount on rent 25 paid for a unit by the tenant, the current rent for each unit reported 26 by the owner to the division shall equal the net effective rent for such 27 unit based upon the value of such concession. 28 (1) For the purposes of this subdivision, the term "concession" shall 29 mean any temporary adjustment to a lease intended to induce a tenant to 30 sign or renew such lease, including without limitation a rebate, 31 discount, waiver, license agreement, proration, money payment, or phys- 32 ical good or service or access thereto. 33 (2) For the purposes of this subdivision, the term "net effective 34 rent" shall mean the average monthly rent charged to and paid by a 35 tenant over the duration of a tenant's occupancy of a unit pursuant to 36 an unexpired lease and any related rider or agreement. 37 § 4. Paragraph a of subdivision 1 of section 421-a of the real proper- 38 ty tax law, as amended by chapter 857 of the laws of 1975 and as renum- 39 bered by chapter 110 of the laws of 1977, is amended to read as follows: 40 a. "Adjusted Monthly Rent." The rent payable per month as provided in 41 the first effective lease or occupancy agreement upon initial occupancy 42 of a rental dwelling unit of a multiple dwelling after construction 43 aided by exemption under this section less the cost of providing parking 44 facilities and electricity, gas, cooking fuel and other utilities other 45 than heat and hot water to occupants of such dwelling units, which sum 46 shall reflect the value of any and all concessions as such term is 47 defined by subdivision f of section twelve-a of the emergency tenant 48 protection act of 1974. 49 § 5. This act shall take effect immediately; provided, however, that 50 the amendments to section 26-517 of chapter 4 of title 26 of the admin- 51 istrative code of the city of New York made by section three of this act 52 shall expire on the same date as such law expires and shall not affect 53 the expiration of such law as provided under section 26-520 of such law.